tests/runtime/intlimits.sbl
// Test minint and maxint work as expected.

externals (stem)

integers (x y)

define stem as (
  $(minint < 0) or fail='minint should be negative'
  $(maxint > 0) or fail='maxint should be positive'

  $(minint <= -32767) or fail='minint should be <= -32767'
  $(maxint >= 32767) or fail='maxint should be >= 32767'

  $(minint + maxint == 0) or $(minint + maxint == -1) or fail='minint+maxint should be 0 or -1'

  $x = minint
  $(x == minint) or fail='minint cannot be stored in a variable'
  $y = x + 1
  $(y - x == 1) or fail='Adding one to minint does not work'

  $x = maxint
  $(x == maxint) or fail='maxint cannot be stored in a variable'
  $y = x - 1
  $(x - y == 1) or fail='Subtracting one from maxint does not work'
)
